District of Columbia statutes.
45-501

Intention of Council not to revive previous repeal unless intention specifically included.

As a rule of statutory interpretation, in enacting a statute which includes among its provisions the repeal of a previously enacted repeal (including the repeal of a proviso or an exception), it is not the intention of the Council of the District of Columbia to revive the statute or part thereof which was previously repealed unless such intention to revive the previously repealed statute is specifically included in the language of the statute repealing the previous repealer.

July 2, 1982, D.C. Law 4-125, § 41, 29 DCR 2093
1981 Ed., § 49-501.